Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-8,201
License without examination;
when; fee.

The board may license without
examination any applicant who is legally licensed
or registered as a professional landscape architect in any other
state, territory, or
country whose requirements for licensure
or registration are at least substantially equivalent to or higher
than the requirements
of the
Professional Landscape Architects Act and which extends the same
privileges of reciprocity to professional landscape
architects licensed in this state and
who has actively practiced for at least one of the three years immediately
preceding the application for licensure without examination.
The application for reciprocal licensure shall be accompanied
by a fee in an amount the board shall determine.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 18, p. 1865;

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 19.
July 19, 2012